Montana, session 2025, HB490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 3], the following definitions apply:
(1) "Approval authority" means the commission for a regulated utility, the board of trustees for an
electric cooperative, the city council or city commission for a municipal utility, or the appropriate body
responsible for corporate governance of any other type of electric facilities provider.
(1)(2) "Commission" has the same meaning as provided in 69-1-101.
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources and conservation, as provided in 2-
15-3301.
(2)(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative organized under Title 35, chapter 18, or a similar
state law for providing electricity to the public in Montana.
(3)(5) “Electric facilities” means any equipment used for the transmission or distribution of electricity
to the public, including but not limited to generation and energy storage resources, substations, switchyards,
poles, towers, transformers, conductors, and relaying, sectionalizing, and protective equipment, such as
arrestors.
(4)(6) "Electric facilities provider" means any of the following that engages in electric transmission
and distribution activities as defined in this section:
(a) a an operator, regulated utility, or electric cooperative, ; as well as
(b) a municipally owned utility; or
(c) an entity, owning electric facilities in the state without regard to the jurisdiction of the
commission, ; or
(d) a transmitting utility under the jurisdiction of the federal energy regulatory commission, which
engages in electric transmission and distribution activities as defined in this section.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 490
(5)(7) "Electric transmission and distribution activities" means a condition, activity, or facility directly
related to the conveyance and distribution of electrical energy to a person, facility, transmission, or distribution
system in the state.
(8) "Jointly owned electric facility" means an identified set of electric facilities that is jointly owned
by multiple parties and operated by a designated operator.
(9) "Operator" means the person or entity designated by the owners of a jointly owned electric
facility as defined in this section as responsible for the operation and maintenance of jointly owned electric
facilities.
(6)(10) "Regulated utility" means a public electric utility regulated by the commission under Title 69,
chapter 3.
(7)(11) "Wildfire" has the same meaning as "forest or range fire" as defined in 50-63-104 and, for the
purposes of [sections 1 through 3], a fire ignited by electric facilities or activities associated with electric
transmission and distribution activities, regardless of whether the fire's ignition occurs within an incorporated
municipality.
(8)(12) "Wildfire mitigation plan" means an electric facilities provider's written plan, including any
related components, that identifies risks associated with wildfire and strategies to mitigate or reduce those risks.
Section 2. Electric facilities provider -- wildfire -- wildfire mitigation plan approval. (1) An
electric facilities provider may shall prepare a wildfire mitigation plan in accordance with this section and submit
the plan to its approval authority and commence implementation of its wildfire mitigation plan no later than
December 31, 2025. An electric facilities provider shall resubmit an updated or subsequent wildfire mitigation
plan to its approval authority at least every 3 years.
(2) A wildfire mitigation plan must include a description of:
(a) areas in which the electric facilities provider has electric facilities or electric transmission and
distribution activities that may be subject to a heightened risk of wildfire;
(b) the strategies and programs that the electric facilities provider will use to inspect, maintain,
repair, and operate its electric facilities;
(c) the strategies and programs that the electric facilities provider will use to perform vegetation
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 490
management;
(d) the strategies for modifications or upgrades to electric facilities and preventative programs that
the electric facilities provider may will employ to reduce the risk of its electric facilities igniting a wildfire;
(e) the strategies and methods for de-energizing power lines and modifying electric facility
operations to mitigate potential wildfires taking into consideration the ability of the electric facilities provider to
reasonably access the proposed electric facility to be de-energized, the balance of the risk of wildfire with the
need for continued supply of electricity to a community, and any potential impact to public safety, first
responders, and health and communications infrastructure;
(f) the methods the electric facilities provider intends to use to restore its electrical system in the
event systems are de-energized for the prevention of a wildfire;
(g) the estimated incremental costs associated with implementing the plan, including system
improvements and upgrades for a regulated utility;
(h) community outreach and public awareness efforts before and during a wildfire season; and
(i) potential participation, if applicable, with state or local wildland fire protection plans or wildfire
mitigation plans.
(3) An electric cooperative must present incremental costs associated with implementing a wildfire
mitigation plan to its board of trustees approval authority for consideration when reviewing the plan;. however,
However, those costs may not be a part of the wildfire mitigation plan itself.
(4) For the purposes of [sections 1 through 3], the commission for a regulated utility, the board of
trustees for an electric cooperative, or the governing body of any other type of approval authority for an electric
facilities provider must provider's wildfire mitigation plan shall:
(a) initially review an electric facilities provider's wildfire mitigation plan; and
(b) consider any input from a federal, tribal, state, or local entity, or other interested persons during
a public comment period not to exceed 45 days; and
(c) after a public meeting and no more than 60 days after the close of public comment:
(i) approve the wildfire mitigation plan or identify any deficiencies in the plan; and
(ii) provide required modifications in writing with the opportunity for the electric facilities provider to
correct the deficiencies and resubmit the plan for approval.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 490
(5) The department and Montana disaster and emergency services shall review a wildfire
mitigation plan submitted to the commission and within the public comment period provide comments and
recommendations regarding aspects of the plan within each of their jurisdictions.
(6) The approval authority shall approve the wildfire mitigation plan if the approval authority
determines the wildfire mitigation plan contains the required components in subsection (2), is in the public
interest, and reasonably balances the incremental costs of implementing the plan with the risk of a potential
wildfire.
(5) After a public meeting and no more than 60 days after the close of public comment, the
commission for a regulated utility shall identify any deficiencies in a wildfire mitigation plan and provide written
comments addressing whether the wildfire mitigation plan is reasonable, is in the public interest, and
reasonably balances the incremental costs of implementing the plan with the risk of a potential wildfire.
(6)(7) If an electric facilities provider prepares a wildfire mitigation plan in accordance with this
section, No later than June 1 of each year, the electric facilities provider shall submit to its governing body
approval authority a biennial report summarizing the electric facilities provider's wildfire mitigation efforts and
compliance with the its currently authorized wildfire mitigation plan.
(8) For any jointly owned electric facilities, the operator shall prepare and implement the required
wildfire mitigation plan for the jointly owned electric facilities. If an owner of a jointly owned electric facility is a
regulated utility, the commission is the approval authority whether or not the operator is a regulated utility. The
operator's submission and implementation of a wildfire mitigation plan as required by this subsection satisfies
the obligations under this section for the jointly owned electric facility only.
(7)(9) In accordance with the Montana Administrative Procedure Act, the commission may make any
necessary rules establishing procedures for the review and comment on a regulated utility's wildfire mitigation
plan, including for the appointment of a technical master to determine whether the wildfire mitigation plan
contains the required components in subsection (2).
(10) Nothing in this section may be construed to create a new liability, basis for claim, or separate
legal cause of action arising from the review or approval of a wildfire mitigation plan when none would exist
otherwise.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 490
Section 3. Electric facilities provider -- wildfire -- cause of action -- standard of care --
damages. (1) The purpose of this section is to set statutory criteria governing the civil liability of an electric
facilities provider for wildfire-related claims. An electric facilities provider has an obligation to serve the public,
and a standard of strict liability may not be applied to an electric facilities provider as follows:
(a) in a cause of action alleging the electric facilities provider's electric facilities or electric
transmission and distribution activities caused wildfire-related damages; or
(b) in a cause of action alleging an electric facilities provider's wildfire mitigation activities
conducted in accordance with a wildfire mitigation plan caused damages.
(2) An electric facilities provider may be found civilly liable only under the provisions of this section,
and may not be found civilly liable under any other statute, theory of recovery, or common law claim, for
wildfire-related injury or damages arising from the electric facilities provider's electric facilities or electric
transmission and distribution activities or for injury or damages arising from any act or omission of the electric
facilities provider associated with implementing a wildfire mitigation plan.
(3) An electric facilities provider may be found civilly liable for:
(a) wildfire-related injury or damages arising from the electric facilities provider's electric facilities
or electric transmission and distribution activities; or for
(b) injury or damages arising from an act or omission of the electric facilities provider associated
with implementing a wildfire mitigation plan only if the party seeking recovery establishes:
(a)(i) the electric facilities provider failed to exercise the degree of care, skill, and learning expected
of a reasonable, similarly situated electric facilities provider at the time in the state, acting under the same or
similar circumstances; and
(b)(ii) the failure was an actual and the proximate cause of the injury to person or property for which
recovery is sought.
(4) After an electric facilities provider has commenced implementation of its wildfire mitigation plan,
in In an action against an electric facilities provider seeking wildfire-related damages arising from the electric
facilities provider's electric facilities or electric transmission and distribution activities, there is a rebuttable
presumption that the electric facilities provider acted reasonably if, with respect to the place of the wildfire's
ignition, the electric facilities provider has adopted and, with respect to the place of the wildfire's ignition,
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 490
substantially followed a wildfire mitigation plan that contains at a minimum the elements in [section 2(2)] was
approved in accordance with [section 2], provided that evidence related to the electric facilities provider's actual
incremental costs associated with implementing a wildfire mitigation plan may not be considered in determining
whether the electric facilities provider substantially followed its wildfire mitigation plan. The presumption in this
subsection (4) may be controverted by other evidence.
(5) In an action against an electric facilities provider seeking wildfire-related damages arising from
the electric facilities provider's electric facilities or electric transmission and distribution activities, the absence of
a wildfire mitigation plan may not be construed as evidence of or an inference that the electric facilities provider
did not meet the standard in subsection (3)(a), and the fact finder may consider only acts that may have caused
the wildfire's ignition and evaluate the electric facilities provider's acts and electric transmission and distribution
activities in the context of the electric facilities provider's overall systems, processes, and programs.
(6)(5) In an action against an electric facilities provider under this section, if a plaintiff has proved
liability, as required:
(a) a plaintiff may recover for real and personal property damage pursuant to 50-63-104;
(b) in the event of a bodily injury or death, a plaintiff may recover:
(i) economic damages, including medical expenses and lost wages; and
(ii) noneconomic damages;
(b)(c) a plaintiff may not recover noneconomic losses unless the plaintiff suffered bodily injury or
death proximately caused by the wildfire; and
(c)(d) an electric facilities provider may not be assessed punitive damages unless there is a showing,
by clear and convincing evidence, that the electric facilities provider's actions were grossly negligent or
intentional. An electric facilities provider's acts or omissions may not be considered grossly negligent if the
electric facilities provider substantially followed its wildfire mitigation plan with respect to the place of ignition.
The availability of punitive damages is otherwise subject to the provisions of 27-1-220 and 27-1-221.
(e) a person who obtains payment pursuant to a policy of insurance for damages resulting from a
wildfire loss is deemed to have been made whole exclusively for purposes of an insurer's right to subrogation
under this section.
(7) An electric facilities provider may not be liable in an action brought under this section to the
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 490
extent that the electric facilities provider establishes that contact between electric facilities and trees or tree
limbs originating outside an area the electric facilities provider has a legal right to access or maintain caused
the wildfire ' s ignition, provided, however, this subsection does not alter the rights or obligations under 69-4-
103.
(8)(6) A civil action against an electric facilities provider under this section must be commenced within
3 years from the date the plaintiff first incurred injury or damages, without regard to when the injury or damages
are discovered. If a plaintiff commences a civil action under this section, the plaintiff shall make service of
process no later than 6 months after filing the complaint. If service of process is not made within the 6-month
period, the court, on motion or on its own initiative, shall dismiss the action without prejudice as to a defendant
unless that defendant has made an appearance in the civil action. If service of process is not made within the 6-
month period, the remaining 3-year period of limitations for a civil action under this section resumes, regardless
of whether the civil action is dismissed.
(7) This section does not affect express contractual rights of any person or entity in any way
involving communications facilities or the shared use of electric facilities or pole attachments.
Section 4. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 5. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 3] are intended to be codified as a new part
in Title 69, chapter 2, and the provisions of Title 69, chapter 2, apply to [sections 1 through 3].
Section 6. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are severable from the
invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications, the part remains in
effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
Section 7. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 490
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 490, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 490
INTRODUCED BY A. REGIER, G. OBLANDER, K. ZOLNIKOV, T. FRANCE
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATING TO WILDFIRES AND UTILITIES; ALLOWING REQUIRING
CERTAIN ENTITIES TO SUBMIT AN APPROVED PREPARE A WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN; PROVIDING
DEFINITIONS; PROVIDING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN; PROVIDING FOR
APPROVAL OF THE WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN; REQUIRING UPDATED REPORTS RELATING TO THE
WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN AND SUBMISSION OF AN UPDATED WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN;
PROVIDING THAT CERTAIN ENTITIES THAT HAVE FILED A SUBSTANTIALLY FOLLOWED AN APPROVED
WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLAN ARE MAY NOT BE CIVILLY LIABLE ARE AFFORDED CERTAIN CIVIL
LIABILITY PROTECTIONS FOR INJURY OR DAMAGES CAUSED BY WILDFIRE; REVISING THE STANDARD
OF CARE RELATING TO CERTAIN ENTITIES AND WILDFIRE; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY TO
THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION RELATING TO WILDFIRE MITIGATION PLANS; AND PROVIDING AN
IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”